West Virginia, session 2025, HB3304.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 3. MONUMENTS, TABLETS AND MEMORIALS. §10-3-3. Patriotic memorials to commemorate Semiquincentennial Celebration of the United States; timeline of construction; commission. (a) Legislative findings. – The Legislature acknowledges than 250 years of the existence of the United States is a momentous occasion. To mark this occasion, patriotic monuments should be erected in the northern, southern, eastern, and western parts of the state. (b) Enactment. – (1) Patriotic statues shall be erected in this state to acknowledge 250 years of the United States. (2) These patriotic statues shall be erected in the northern, southern, eastern and western part of the state. (3) The statues shall be patriotic in nature, and memorialize the country's birth, as well as West Virginia's state heritage. (4) These patriotic statues shall be erected before the 2026 Semiquincentennial date.(c) Commission. – (1) A commission shall be established on July 1, 2025, to oversee construction of the patriotic statues. The commission shall be comprised of:(A) The Secretary of Tourism, who shall serve as chairperson;(B) Two citizens of West Virginia, who shall be appointed by the Governor(2) A majority of the members of the commission must be present at a meeting to constitute a quorum, and a majority of those members present at a meeting must vote in the affirmative in order to pass a motion. A meeting may be called by the chair and at least five days written notice of the meeting must be provided to the members of the commission. (3) The commission shall solicit bids for construction of the monument and shall adhere to all state purchasing and payment processing laws and regulations in paying its construction vendors, with a target completion date of the 2026 Semiquincentennial.